SpellChecker/bash.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY -абвгғдҙеёжзийкҡлмнңоөпрсҫтуүфхһцчшщъыьэәюяАБВГҒДҘЕЁЖЗИЙКҠЛМНҢОӨПРСҪТУҮФХҺЦЧШЩЪЫЬЭӘЮЯ

REP 0

FLAG long

WORDCHARS -

SFX A01 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A01 0 ыраҡ .	+Comp

SFX A02 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A02 0 ерәк .	+Comp

SFX A03 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A03 0 ораҡ .	+Comp

SFX A04 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A04 0 өрәк .	+Comp

SFX A05 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A05 0 ыраҡ .	+Comp

SFX A06 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A06 0 ерәк .	+Comp

SFX A07 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A07 0 ораҡ .	+Comp

SFX A08 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A08 0 өрәк .	+Comp

SFX A09 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A09 0 раҡ .	+Comp

SFX A10 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A10 0 рәк .	+Comp

SFX A11 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A11 0 раҡ .	+Comp

SFX A12 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A12 0 рәк .	+Comp

SFX A13 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A13 0 ыраҡ .	+Comp

SFX A14 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A14 0 ерәк .	+Comp

SFX A15 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A15 0 ораҡ .	+Comp

SFX A16 Y 1 # A прилагательное
SFX A16 0 өрәк .	+Comp

SFX B01 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B01 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B02 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B02 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B03 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B03 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B04 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B04 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B05 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B05 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B06 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B06 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B07 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B07 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B08 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B08 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B09 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B09 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B10 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B10 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B11 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B11 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B12 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B12 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B13 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B13 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B14 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B14 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B15 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B15 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX B16 Y 1 # Po послелог
SFX B16 0 0 .	[Po]

SFX C01 Y 1 # Conj союз
SFX C01 0 0 .	[Conj]

SFX D01 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D01 0 ыраҡ .	+Comp

SFX D02 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D02 0 ерәк .	+Comp

SFX D03 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D03 0 ораҡ .	+Comp

SFX D04 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D04 0 өрәк .	+Comp

SFX D05 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D05 0 ыраҡ .	+Comp

SFX D06 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D06 0 ерәк .	+Comp

SFX D07 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D07 0 ораҡ .	+Comp

SFX D08 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D08 0 өрәк .	+Comp

SFX D09 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D09 0 раҡ .	+Comp

SFX D10 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D10 0 рәк .	+Comp

SFX D11 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D11 0 раҡ .	+Comp

SFX D12 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D12 0 рәк .	+Comp

SFX D13 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D13 0 ыраҡ .	+Comp

SFX D14 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D14 0 ерәк .	+Comp

SFX D15 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D15 0 ораҡ .	+Comp

SFX D16 Y 1 # Adv наречие
SFX D16 0 өрәк .	+Comp

SFX F1 Y 162 # фамилия N13
SFX F1 0 а ов	+Sg+Nom
SFX F1 0 атар/X49 ов	+Pl
SFX F1 0 атың/X50 ов	+Gen
SFX F1 0 аҡа/X50 ов	+Dat
SFX F1 0 аты/X50 ов	+Acc
SFX F1 0 атан/X50 ов	+Abl
SFX F1 0 ата/X50 ов	+Loc
SFX F1 0 амын/X51 ов	+Pred1Sg
SFX F1 0 аһың/X51 ов	+Pred2Sg
SFX F1 0 абыҙ/X51 ов	+Pred1Pl
SFX F1 0 аһығыҙ/X51 ов	+Pred2Pl
SFX F1 0 аым/X52 ов	+PxSg1
SFX F1 0 аың/X52 ов	+PxSg2
SFX F1 0 аы/X52 ов	+PxSg3
SFX F1 0 аыбыҙ/X52 ов	+PxPl1
SFX F1 0 аығыҙ/X52 ов	+PxPl2
SFX F1 0 амы/X53 ов	+Q
SFX F1 0 атыр ов	+Indf
SFX F1 0 асы ов	+Clt/сы
SFX F1 0 атыҡы/X54 ов	+Poss
SFX F1 0 аҡай/X55 ов	+Dim
SFX F1 0 атай/X56 ов	+Der/дай
SFX F1 0 аса/X56 ов	+Der/са
SFX F1 0 атағы/X57 ов	+Der/дағы
SFX F1 0 алы/X58 ов	+Der/лы
SFX F1 0 аһыҙ/X59 ов	+Abe
SFX F1 0 аҡаса/X60 ов	+Der/ҡаса
SFX F1 0 а ёв	+Sg+Nom
SFX F1 0 атар/X49 ёв	+Pl
SFX F1 0 атың/X50 ёв	+Gen
SFX F1 0 аҡа/X50 ёв	+Dat
SFX F1 0 аты/X50 ёв	+Acc
SFX F1 0 атан/X50 ёв	+Abl
SFX F1 0 ата/X50 ёв	+Loc
SFX F1 0 амын/X51 ёв	+Pred1Sg
SFX F1 0 аһың/X51 ёв	+Pred2Sg
SFX F1 0 абыҙ/X51 ёв	+Pred1Pl
SFX F1 0 аһығыҙ/X51 ёв	+Pred2Pl
SFX F1 0 аым/X52 ёв	+PxSg1
SFX F1 0 аың/X52 ёв	+PxSg2
SFX F1 0 аы/X52 ёв	+PxSg3
SFX F1 0 аыбыҙ/X52 ёв	+PxPl1
SFX F1 0 аығыҙ/X52 ёв	+PxPl2
SFX F1 0 амы/X53 ёв	+Q
SFX F1 0 атыр ёв	+Indf
SFX F1 0 асы ёв	+Clt/сы
SFX F1 0 атыҡы/X54 ёв	+Poss
SFX F1 0 аҡай/X55 ёв	+Dim
SFX F1 0 атай/X56 ёв	+Der/дай
SFX F1 0 аса/X56 ёв	+Der/са
SFX F1 0 атағы/X57 ёв	+Der/дағы
SFX F1 0 алы/X58 ёв	+Der/лы
SFX F1 0 аһыҙ/X59 ёв	+Abe
SFX F1 0 аҡаса/X60 ёв	+Der/ҡаса
SFX F1 0 а ын	+Sg+Nom
SFX F1 0 атар/X49 ын	+Pl
SFX F1 0 атың/X50 ын	+Gen
SFX F1 0 аҡа/X50 ын	+Dat
SFX F1 0 аты/X50 ын	+Acc
SFX F1 0 атан/X50 ын	+Abl
SFX F1 0 ата/X50 ын	+Loc
SFX F1 0 амын/X51 ын	+Pred1Sg
SFX F1 0 аһың/X51 ын	+Pred2Sg
SFX F1 0 абыҙ/X51 ын	+Pred1Pl
SFX F1 0 аһығыҙ/X51 ын	+Pred2Pl
SFX F1 0 аым/X52 ын	+PxSg1
SFX F1 0 аың/X52 ын	+PxSg2
SFX F1 0 аы/X52 ын	+PxSg3
SFX F1 0 аыбыҙ/X52 ын	+PxPl1
SFX F1 0 аығыҙ/X52 ын	+PxPl2
SFX F1 0 амы/X53 ын	+Q
SFX F1 0 атыр ын	+Indf
SFX F1 0 асы ын	+Clt/сы
SFX F1 0 атыҡы/X54 ын	+Poss
SFX F1 0 аҡай/X55 ын	+Dim
SFX F1 0 атай/X56 ын	+Der/дай
SFX F1 0 аса/X56 ын	+Der/са
SFX F1 0 атағы/X57 ын	+Der/дағы
SFX F1 0 алы/X58 ын	+Der/лы
SFX F1 0 аһыҙ/X59 ын	+Abe
SFX F1 0 аҡаса/X60 ын	+Der/ҡаса
SFX F1 0 а ев	+Sg+Nom
SFX F1 0 атар/X49 ев	+Pl
SFX F1 0 атың/X50 ев	+Gen
SFX F1 0 аҡа/X50 ев	+Dat
SFX F1 0 аты/X50 ев	+Acc
SFX F1 0 атан/X50 ев	+Abl
SFX F1 0 ата/X50 ев	+Loc
SFX F1 0 амын/X51 ев	+Pred1Sg
SFX F1 0 аһың/X51 ев	+Pred2Sg
SFX F1 0 абыҙ/X51 ев	+Pred1Pl
SFX F1 0 аһығыҙ/X51 ев	+Pred2Pl
SFX F1 0 аым/X52 ев	+PxSg1
SFX F1 0 аың/X52 ев	+PxSg2
SFX F1 0 аы/X52 ев	+PxSg3
SFX F1 0 аыбыҙ/X52 ев	+PxPl1
SFX F1 0 аығыҙ/X52 ев	+PxPl2
SFX F1 0 амы/X53 ев	+Q
SFX F1 0 атыр ев	+Indf
SFX F1 0 асы ев	+Clt/сы
SFX F1 0 атыҡы/X54 ев	+Poss
SFX F1 0 аҡай/X55 ев	+Dim
SFX F1 0 атай/X56 ев	+Der/дай
SFX F1 0 аса/X56 ев	+Der/са
SFX F1 0 атағы/X57 ев	+Der/дағы
SFX F1 0 алы/X58 ев	+Der/лы
SFX F1 0 аһыҙ/X59 ев	+Abe
SFX F1 0 аҡаса/X60 ев	+Der/ҡаса
SFX F1 0 а ин	+Sg+Nom
SFX F1 0 атар/X49 ин	+Pl
SFX F1 0 атың/X50 ин	+Gen
SFX F1 0 аҡа/X50 ин	+Dat
SFX F1 0 аты/X50 ин	+Acc
SFX F1 0 атан/X50 ин	+Abl
SFX F1 0 ата/X50 ин	+Loc
SFX F1 0 амын/X51 ин	+Pred1Sg
SFX F1 0 аһың/X51 ин	+Pred2Sg
SFX F1 0 абыҙ/X51 ин	+Pred1Pl
SFX F1 0 аһығыҙ/X51 ин	+Pred2Pl
SFX F1 0 аым/X52 ин	+PxSg1
SFX F1 0 аың/X52 ин	+PxSg2
SFX F1 0 аы/X52 ин	+PxSg3
SFX F1 0 аыбыҙ/X52 ин	+PxPl1
SFX F1 0 аығыҙ/X52 ин	+PxPl2
SFX F1 0 амы/X53 ин	+Q
SFX F1 0 атыр ин	+Indf
SFX F1 0 асы ин	+Clt/сы
SFX F1 0 атыҡы/X54 ин	+Poss
SFX F1 0 аҡай/X55 ин	+Dim
SFX F1 0 атай/X56 ин	+Der/дай
SFX F1 0 аса/X56 ин	+Der/са
SFX F1 0 атағы/X57 ин	+Der/дағы
SFX F1 0 алы/X58 ин	+Der/лы
SFX F1 0 аһыҙ/X59 ин	+Abe
SFX F1 0 аҡаса/X60 ин	+Der/ҡаса
SFX F1 ий ая ский	+Sg+Nom
SFX F1 ий аятар/X49 ский	+Pl
SFX F1 ий аятың/X50 ский	+Gen
SFX F1 ий аяҡа/X50 ский	+Dat
SFX F1 ий аяты/X50 ский	+Acc
SFX F1 ий аятан/X50 ский	+Abl
SFX F1 ий аята/X50 ский	+Loc
SFX F1 ий аямын/X51 ский	+Pred1Sg
SFX F1 ий аяһың/X51 ский	+Pred2Sg
SFX F1 ий аябыҙ/X51 ский	+Pred1Pl
SFX F1 ий аяһығыҙ/X51 ский	+Pred2Pl
SFX F1 ий аяым/X52 ский	+PxSg1
SFX F1 ий аяың/X52 ский	+PxSg2
SFX F1 ий аяы/X52 ский	+PxSg3
SFX F1 ий аяыбыҙ/X52 ский	+PxPl1
SFX F1 ий аяығыҙ/X52 ский	+PxPl2
SFX F1 ий аямы/X53 ский	+Q
SFX F1 ий аятыр ский	+Indf
SFX F1 ий аясы ский	+Clt/сы
SFX F1 ий аятыҡы/X54 ский	+Poss
SFX F1 ий аяҡай/X55 ский	+Dim
SFX F1 ий аятай/X56 ский	+Der/дай
SFX F1 ий аяса/X56 ский	+Der/са
SFX F1 ий аятағы/X57 ский	+Der/дағы
SFX F1 ий аялы/X58 ский	+Der/лы
SFX F1 ий аяһыҙ/X59 ский	+Abe
SFX F1 ий аяҡаса/X60 ский	+Der/ҡаса

SFX F2 Y 1 # имя
SFX F2 0 0 .

SFX F3 Y 1 # имя (man_names.txt)
SFX F3 0 0 .

SFX F4 Y 1 # имя (woman-names.txt)
SFX F4 0 0 .

SFX F5 Y 27 # отчество N13
SFX F5 ич на вич	+Sg+Nom
SFX F5 ич натар/X49 вич	+Pl
SFX F5 ич натың/X50 вич	+Gen
SFX F5 ич наҡа/X50 вич	+Dat
SFX F5 ич наты/X50 вич	+Acc
SFX F5 ич натан/X50 вич	+Abl
SFX F5 ич ната/X50 вич	+Loc
SFX F5 ич намын/X51 вич	+Pred1Sg
SFX F5 ич наһың/X51 вич	+Pred2Sg
SFX F5 ич набыҙ/X51 вич	+Pred1Pl
SFX F5 ич наһығыҙ/X51 вич	+Pred2Pl
SFX F5 ич наым/X52 вич	+PxSg1
SFX F5 ич наың/X52 вич	+PxSg2
SFX F5 ич наы/X52 вич	+PxSg3
SFX F5 ич наыбыҙ/X52 вич	+PxPl1
SFX F5 ич наығыҙ/X52 вич	+PxPl2
SFX F5 ич намы/X53 вич	+Q
SFX F5 ич натыр вич	+Indf
SFX F5 ич насы вич	+Clt/сы
SFX F5 ич натыҡы/X54 вич	+Poss
SFX F5 ич наҡай/X55 вич	+Dim
SFX F5 ич натай/X56 вич	+Der/дай
SFX F5 ич наса/X56 вич	+Der/са
SFX F5 ич натағы/X57 вич	+Der/дағы
SFX F5 ич налы/X58 вич	+Der/лы
SFX F5 ич наһыҙ/X59 вич	+Abe
SFX F5 ич наҡаса/X60 вич	+Der/ҡаса

SFX F6 Y 1 # отчество неправильное
SFX F6 0 0 .

SFX I01 Y 1 # междометия Interj
SFX I01 0 0 .	[Interj]

SFX K01 Y 1 # не определено
SFX K01 0 0 .

SFX L01 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L01 0 0/O1 .

SFX L02 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L02 0 0/O1 .

SFX L03 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L03 0 0/O1 .

SFX L04 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L04 0 0/O1 .

SFX L05 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L05 0 0/O1 .

SFX L06 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L06 0 0/O1 .

SFX L07 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L07 0 0/O1 .

SFX L08 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L08 0 0/O1 .

SFX L09 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L09 0 0/O1 .

SFX L10 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L10 0 0/O1 .

SFX L11 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L11 0 0/O1 .

SFX L12 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L12 0 0/O1 .

SFX L13 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L13 0 0/O1 .

SFX L14 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L14 0 0/O1 .

SFX L15 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L15 0 0/O1 .

SFX L16 Y 1 # числительные Num
SFX L16 0 0/O1 .

SFX M01 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M01 0 0/O1 .

SFX M02 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M02 0 0/O1 .

SFX M03 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M03 0 0/O1 .

SFX M04 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M04 0 0/O1 .

SFX M05 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M05 0 0/O1 .

SFX M06 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M06 0 0/O1 .

SFX M07 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M07 0 0/O1 .

SFX M08 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M08 0 0/O1 .

SFX M09 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M09 0 0/O1 .

SFX M10 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M10 0 0/O1 .

SFX M11 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M11 0 0/O1 .

SFX M12 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M12 0 0/O1 .

SFX M13 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M13 0 0/O1 .

SFX M14 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M14 0 0/O1 .

SFX M15 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M15 0 0/O1 .

SFX M16 Y 1 # местоимения Pron
SFX M16 0 0/O1 .

SFX N01 Y 27 # существительные Noun
SFX N01 0 дар/O01 [^з][^ь]	+Pl
SFX N01 ь дар/O01 [з][ь]	+Pl
SFX N01 0 дың/O02 .	+Gen
SFX N01 0 ға/O02 .	+Dat
SFX N01 0 ды/O02 .	+Acc
SFX N01 0 дан/O02 .	+Abl
SFX N01 0 да/O02 .	+Loc
SFX N01 0 мын/O03 .	+Pred1Sg
SFX N01 0 һың/O03 .	+Pred2Sg
SFX N01 0 быҙ/O03 .	+Pred1Pl
SFX N01 0 һығыҙ/O03 .	+Pred2Pl
SFX N01 0 ым/O04 .	+PxSg1
SFX N01 0 ың/O04 .	+PxSg2
SFX N01 0 ы/O04 .	+PxSg3
SFX N01 0 ыбыҙ/O04 .	+PxPl1
SFX N01 0 ығыҙ/O04 .	+PxPl2
SFX N01 0 мы/O05 .	+Q
SFX N01 0 дыр .	+Indf
SFX N01 0 сы .	+Clt/сы
SFX N01 0 дыҡы/O06 .	+Poss
SFX N01 0 ҡай/O07 .	+Dim
SFX N01 0 дай/O08 .	+Der/дай
SFX N01 0 са/O08 .	+Der/са
SFX N01 0 дағы/O09 .	+Der/дағы
SFX N01 0 лы/O10 .	+Der/лы
SFX N01 0 һыҙ/O11 .	+Abe
SFX N01 0 ғаса/O12 .	+Der/ҡаса

SFX N02 Y 27 # существительные Noun
SFX N02 0 дәр/O13 [^лн][^ь]	+Pl
SFX N02 ь дәр/O13 [лн][ь]	+Pl
SFX N02 0 дең/O14 .	+Gen
SFX N02 0 гә/O14 .	+Dat
SFX N02 0 де/O14 .	+Acc
SFX N02 0 дән/O14 .	+Abl
SFX N02 0 дә/O14 .	+Loc
SFX N02 0 мен/O15 .	+Pred1Sg
SFX N02 0 һең/O15 .	+Pred2Sg
SFX N02 0 беҙ/O15 .	+Pred1Pl
SFX N02 0 һегеҙ/O15 .	+Pred2Pl
SFX N02 0 ем/O16 .	+PxSg1
SFX N02 0 ең/O16 .	+PxSg2
SFX N02 0 е/O16 .	+PxSg3
SFX N02 0 ебеҙ/O16 .	+PxPl1
SFX N02 0 егеҙ/O16 .	+PxPl2
SFX N02 0 ме/O17 .	+Q
SFX N02 0 дер .	+Indf
SFX N02 0 се .	+Clt/сы
SFX N02 0 деке/O18 .	+Poss
SFX N02 0 кәй/O19 .	+Dim
SFX N02 0 дәй/O20 .	+Der/дай
SFX N02 0 сә/O20 .	+Der/са
SFX N02 0 дәге/O21 .	+Der/дағы
SFX N02 0 ле/O22 .	+Der/лы
SFX N02 0 һеҙ/O23 .	+Abe
SFX N02 0 гәсә/O24 .	+Der/ҡаса
